Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.648

Employees—Peer review committees—Members' immunity—Proceedings—Statement of reasons—Legal representation of members.

(1) Employees, agents, or students of institutions of higher education serving on peer review committees which recommend or decide on appointment, reappointment, tenure, promotion, merit raises, dismissal, or other disciplinary measures for employees of the institution, are immune from civil actions for damages arising from the good faith performance of their duties as members of the committees. Individuals who provide written or oral statements in support of or against a person reviewed are also immune from civil actions if their statements are made in good faith.

(2) Peer review proceedings shall be pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the respective institutions of higher education.

(3) Upon the request of an evaluated person, the appropriate administrative officer of the institution shall provide a statement of the reasons of the peer review committees and of participating administrative officers for a final unfavorable decision on merit, promotion, tenure or reappointment. In the case of a disciplinary or dismissal proceeding, a statement of reasons shall be provided by the reviewing committee to the evaluated person for any decision unfavorable to such person.

(4) The institutions of higher education shall provide legal representation for any past or current members of the peer review committee and for individuals who testify orally or in writing in good faith before such committee in any legal action which may arise from committee proceedings.

[ 1984 c 137 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1984 c 137: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1984 c 137 s 2.]